Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 15
MOTORCYCLES

Cross references:

For minimum safety standards for motorcycles, see § 42-4-232; for penalties for class A traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-1501. Traffic laws apply to persons operating motorcycles - special permits.

Every person operating a motorcycle shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of any other vehicle under this article, except as to special regulations in this article and except as to those provisions of this article which by their nature can have no application.

For the purposes of a prearranged organized special event and upon a showing that safety will be reasonably maintained, the department of transportation may grant a special permit exempting the operation of a motorcycle from any requirement of this part 15.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2398, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1301 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1501 was relocated to § 42-4-1701.

42-4-1502. Riding on motorcycles - protective helmet.

A person operating a motorcycle shall ride only upon the permanent and regular seat attached thereto, and such operator shall not carry any other person nor shall any other person ride on a motorcycle unless such motorcycle is designed to carry more than one person, in which event a passenger may ride upon the permanent seat if designed for two persons or upon another seat firmly attached to the motorcycle at the rear or side of the operator.

A person shall ride upon a motorcycle only while sitting astride the seat, facing forward, with one leg on either side of the motorcycle.

No person shall operate a motorcycle while carrying packages, bundles, or other articles which prevent the person from keeping both hands on the handlebars.

No operator shall carry any person nor shall any person ride in a position that will interfere with the operation or control of the motorcycle or the view of the operator.

(4.5) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (4.5), a person shall not drive or ride as a passenger on a motorcycle or low-power scooter on a roadway unless:

Each person under eighteen years of age is wearing a protective helmet of a type and design manufactured for use by operators of motorcycles;

The protective helmet conforms to the design and specifications set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4.5); and

The protective helmet is secured properly on the person's head with a chin strap while the motorcycle is in motion.

A protective helmet required to be worn by this subsection (4.5) shall:

Be designed to reduce injuries to the user resulting from head impacts and to protect the user by remaining on the user's head, deflecting blows, resisting penetration, and spreading the force of impact;

Consist of lining, padding, and chin strap; and

Meet or exceed the standards established in the United States department of transportation federal motor vehicle safety standard no. 218, 49 CFR 571.218, for motorcycle helmets.

A person driving or riding a motorcycle need not wear a helmet if the motorcycle has:

Three wheels;

A maximum design speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less;

A windshield; and

Seat belts.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2398, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2007:

(4.5) added, p. 1480, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

IP(4.5)(a) and (4.5)(a)(I) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1283, § 63, effective October 1.

L. 2015:

IP(4.5)(a) amended and (4.5)(c) added, (HB 15-1345), ch. 330, p. 1347, § 3, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1302 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1502 was relocated to § 42-4-1703.

42-4-1503. Operating motorcycles on roadways laned for traffic.

All motorcycles are entitled to full use of a traffic lane, and no motor vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to deprive any motorcycle of the full use of a traffic lane. This subsection (1) shall not apply to motorcycles operated two abreast in a single lane.

The operator of a motorcycle shall not overtake or pass in the same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken.

No person shall operate a motorcycle between lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.

Motorcycles shall not be operated more than two abreast in a single lane.

Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to police officers in the performance of their official duties.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2399, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1303 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1503 was relocated to § 42-4-1704.

42-4-1504. Clinging to other vehicles.

No person riding upon a motorcycle shall attach himself, herself, or the motorcycle to any other vehicle on a roadway. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2399, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1304 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1504 was relocated to § 42-4-1705.